Washington statutes.
RCW 43.211.030

New information services.

Before a state agency or department that provides health and human services establishes a new public information telephone line or hotline, the state agency or department shall consult with WIN 211 about using the 211 system to provide public access to the information.

[ 2003 c 135 s 4.]